District of Columbia statutes.
1-328.11

Definitions.

For the purposes of this part, the term:

(1)

“Candidate” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 1-1161.01(6).

(2)

“Contribution” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 1-1161.01(10).

(3)

“Covered recipient” means:

(A)

An elected District official who is or could be involved in influencing or approving the award of a grant;

(B)

A candidate for elective District office who is or could be involved in influencing or approving the award of a grant;

(C)

A political committee affiliated with a District candidate or elected District official described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph;

(D)

A constituent-service program or fund, or substantially similar entity, controlled, operated, or managed by:

(i)

An elected District official who is or could be involved in influencing or approving the award of a grant; or

(ii)

A person under the supervision, direction, or control of an elected District official who is or could be involved in influencing or approving the award of a grant;

(E)

A political party; or

(F)

An entity or organization:

(i)

That a candidate or elected District official described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph, or a member of his or her immediate family, controls; or

(ii)

In which a candidate or elected District official described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph has an ownership interest of 10% or more.

(4)

“Election” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 1-1161.01(15).

(5)

“Grant” means financial assistance to a person to support or stimulate the accomplishment of a public purpose as defined by the law that authorizes the grant; provided, that the organization, not the District, defines the specific services, the service levels, and the program approach for carrying out the grant.

(6)

“Grant program” means the management or administration by a grantor of grant-making or grant-issuing authority as covered by this part.

(7)

“Grantee” means a person that receives funds under a grant program.

(8)

“Grantor” means a District agency, board, commission, instrumentality, or program designated by law as the grant-managing entity for a grant program.

(9)

“Immediate family” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 1-1161.01(26).

(10)

“Person” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 1-1161.01(42).

(11)

“Political committee” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 1-1161.01(44).

(12)

“Political party” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 1-1161.01(45).

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 1092, 60 DCR 12472
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 1053(a), 62 DCR 10905
This section is referenced in § 1-325.162, § 1-325.211, § 1-325.222, § 1-328.04, § 2-1313, § 2-1373, § 2-1392, § 7-736.01, § 7-1141.06, and § 32-1603.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 rewrote the section.
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 1092 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 1092 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1053(a) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).
Section 1091 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle J of Title I of the act may be cited as the “Grant Administration Act of 2013”.
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.